Georgia, session 2025_26, SB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-2-85.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to license plates
for certain veterans, is amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b)(1) Motor vehicle and trailer owners who are veterans or women veterans, who have
received a military medal award, or who served during active military combat shall be
eligible to receive special and distinctive vehicle license plates for private passenger cars,
motorcycles, trucks, or recreational vehicles used for personal transportation. Such
license plates shall be issued in compliance with the state motor vehicle laws relating to
registration and licensing of motor vehicles as prescribed in Article 2 of this chapter.
(2)(A) Motor vehicle and trailer owners who are veterans or women veterans, who
have received a military medal award, or who served during active military combat
S. B. 293
- 1 -

LC 39 4673
shall be issued upon application for and upon compliance with the state motor vehicle
laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles a veteran's license plate, a
woman veteran's license plate, a military medal award recipient license plate, or a
commemorative service license plate for service during active military combat. Four
such license plates One such license plate shall be issued without payment of the
requisite registration fee, manufacturing fee, or annual registration fee.
(B) Each member or former member of the armed forces of the United States listed in
this subsection shall be entitled to no more than one such free license plate at a time;
provided, however, that, upon payment of a manufacturing fee of $25.00, a member
shall be entitled to one additional such license plate. For each additional license plate
for which a $25.00 manufacturing fee is required, there shall be an additional annual
registration fee of $25.00, and such fee shall be collected by the county tag agent at the
time of collection of other registration fees and shall be remitted to the state as provided
in Code Section 40-2-34 four license plates issued pursuant to this subsection at a time
without payment of the requisite registration fee, manufacturing fee, or annual
registration fee."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 293
- 2 -